Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. State Board of Education and Early Development.

Administrative Code. —

For state board of education, see 4 AAC 03.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, §§ 6-10, 59 et seq.

78 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, §§ 74-92.

Modern status of doctrine of sovereign immunity as applied to public schools and institutions of higher learning. 33 ALR3d 703.

Sec. 14.07.075.
Creation.

There is created at the head of the Department of Education and Early Development a Board of Education and Early Development consisting of seven members.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1967; am § 25 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 14.07.080.
Creation and term of office. [Repealed, § 14 ch 96 1967.]

Sec. 14.07.085.
Appointment of members.

The seven members of the board, no more than four of whom shall be members of the same political party as the governor, shall be appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. In appointing board members, the governor shall consider recommendations made by recognized educational associations in the state.

One member shall be appointed from each of the four judicial districts and three from the state at large with at least one member representing regional educational attendance areas.

The members are entitled to the expenses, travel, and per diem allowances provided by law.

A member may act and receive compensation from the date of appointment until confirmation or rejection by the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1967)

Revisor’s notes. —

The reference in AS

14.07.085(b)

to “state operated rural schools” was changed to “regional educational attendance areas” in 1978 to conform to ch. 124, SLA 1975.

Cross references. —

For further qualifications of members of Board of Education, see AS

39.05.065

.

Sec. 14.07.090.
Appointment of members. [Repealed, § 14 ch 96 SLA 1967.]

Sec. 14.07.095.
Term of office.

The members of the board shall be appointed for overlapping five-year terms commencing on the March 1 following the date of the member’s appointment. Except as provided in AS

39.05.080

(4), a member appointed to fill a vacancy serves for the unexpired term of the member whose vacancy is filled. A vacancy occurring during a term of office is filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1967; am § 4 ch 80 SLA 1996)

Sec. 14.07.100.
Executive officer. [Repealed, § 14 ch 96 SLA 1967.]

Sec. 14.07.105.
Quorum and chair.

Four members constitute a quorum.

The board shall designate one member of the board as the chairperson who serves as chair of the board at the pleasure of the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1967)

Sec. 14.07.110.
Appointment of commissioner.
[Repealed, § 14 ch 96 SLA 1967.]

Sec. 14.07.115.
Removal.

Members of the board serve at the pleasure of the governor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1967)

Sec. 14.07.120.
Term of office and vacancy. [Repealed, § 14 ch 96 SLA 1967.]

Sec. 14.07.125.
Meetings.

The board shall meet at least quarterly.
Meetings may be called by the chair or by a majority of the members of the board.
Meetings shall be held in Juneau unless a majority of the members of the board changes the place of a meeting.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1967)

Sec. 14.07.130.
Removal of commissioner. [Repealed, § 14 ch 96 SLA 1967.]

Sec. 14.07.135.
Legal assistance.

The Department of Law shall provide all legal services for the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1967)

Sec. 14.07.140.
Commissioner administers department. [Repealed, § 14 ch 96 SLA 1967.]

Sec. 14.07.145.
Commissioner of education and early development.

The board shall appoint the commissioner of education and early development subject to the approval of the governor. The commissioner shall be the principal executive officer of the department.

The commissioner shall be appointed without regard to political affiliation and shall have at least a master’s degree with five years’ experience in the field of education since receiving it, with at least three of the five years in an exclusively administrative position.

The commissioner serves at the pleasure of the board and may not be appointed by the board for a fixed term.

The commissioner shall receive the salary set out in AS

39.20.080

.

The commissioner shall employ and remove all classified personnel in the department subject to AS 39.25 (State Personnel Act). The commissioner may employ and remove personnel in the exempt or partially exempt service subject to the approval of the board. Personnel in the exempt or partially exempt service have a right of appeal to the board if they are removed.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 14 SLA 1996.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1967; am §§ 1, 5 ch 14 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1987, subsections (d)-(f) were relettered as (f), (d) and (e), respectively, to conform to the organization of the Alaska Statutes.

In 1999, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” in this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 14.07.150.
Budget and fiscal authority.

The commissioner has responsibility and authority for the preparation and execution of a budget and for the other fiscal affairs of the department, subject to the approval of the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 96 SLA 1967)

Sec. 14.07.155.
Partisan candidacy prohibited.

A member of the board may not be a candidate for partisan political office while serving as a member of the board.

History.

(§ 3 ch 96 SLA 1967)

Sec. 14.07.160.
Bylaws.

The board may adopt bylaws for the management of the department.

The bylaws shall be written and distributed in a manner so as to be readily available to personnel of the department.

This section may not be construed to allow the use of a bylaw rather than a regulation where the subject is of statewide importance or interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 96 SLA 1967; am § 7 ch 46 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 205 SLA 1970)

Sec. 14.07.165.
Duties.

The board shall adopt

statewide goals and require each governing body to adopt written goals that are consistent with local needs;

regulations regarding the application for and award of grants under AS

14.03.125

;

regulations implementing provisions of AS

14.11.014(b)

;

regulations requiring approval by the board before a charter school, state boarding school, or a public school may provide domiciliary services;

[Repealed, § 25 ch 2 SSSLA 2015.]

[Repealed, § 25 ch 2 SSSLA 2015.]

Every five years, the board shall review the mathematics and English and language arts curricula used in the state to ensure the curricula are still effective and are being taught using best practices.

History.

(§ 5 ch 173 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 78 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 113 SLA 1997; am § 6 ch 94 SLA 2001; am §§ 18, 19 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 25 ch 2 SSSLA 2015; am § 2 ch 73 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For statewide goals, see 4 AAC 4.

For statewide student assessment, see 4 AAC 6, art. 4.

For special schools, see 4 AAC 33, art. 1.

For grants for the improvement of school performance, see 4 AAC 33, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(5), substituted “college and career readiness assessment” for “secondary school student competency examination” near the beginning, and “, providing for the needs of a student who is a child with a disability, and setting standards for a waiver under AS

14.03.075

; the regulations may address the conditions, criteria, procedure, and scheduling of the assessment” for “, including the criteria and procedure under which a governing body uses a waiver to grant a diploma to a student, criteria regarding granting a waiver must include provisions that a waiver may only be granted for students who enter the system late or have rare or unusual circumstances meriting a waiver” at the end; added (b).

The 2015 amendment, effective June 30, 2016, repealed (a)(5) and (b).

The 2018 amendment, effective October 28, 2018, added (c).

Sec. 14.07.168.
Report to the legislature.

Not later than the 30th legislative day of each regular session of the legislature, the board shall prepare and present in person to the legislative committees having jurisdiction over education an annual report that describes the efforts of the board to develop, maintain, and continuously improve a comprehensive quality public education system, as provided for under the bylaws of the board. The report must include

a summary of the resolves and rationales provided in support of policy decisions made under AS

14.03.015

;

program and curriculum changes made, discussed, or recommended in meetings held under AS

14.07.125

;

additional information relevant to efforts made to improve and maintain the public education system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 14 SLA 2011)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 14, SLA 2011, which enacted this section, took effect on August 25, 2011.

Sec. 14.07.170.
Additional powers and duties of board.

The board may

appoint unpaid advisory commissions;

require school boards or school personnel to submit to the department, in the form the board may require, the district budget or any information or reports that are reasonably necessary to assist the department in carrying out its functions.

The board shall review grant applications recommended under AS

14.11.013

and may approve grant applications under AS

14.11.015

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 5 ch 96 SLA 1967; am § 3 ch 5 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For school and district accountability, see 4 AAC 6, art. 5.

For school operating fund, see 4 AAC 9, art. 2.

For correspondence study programs, see 4 AAC 33, art. 4.

Sec. 14.07.175.
Development of statewide assessment plan; review of education laws and regulations.

History.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 54 SLA 2016.]

Sec. 14.07.180.
Curricula approval and review; pilot program; incentives.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall establish standards and a procedure for the review, ranking, and approval of mathematics and English and language arts curricula for school districts to use in each grade level as provided in this section. The board may include curricula delivered through virtual education in the standards and procedure established under this subsection.

The department, in consultation with school districts, shall review mathematics and English and language arts curricula used in schools in the state and in other states and countries and may include in the review curricula delivered through virtual education. Not later than July 1, 2019, the department shall identify the best mathematics and English and language arts curricula and the best teaching practices for each of the curricula. The department may identify the best mathematics and English and language arts curricula delivered through virtual education.

The department shall submit the curricula and teaching practices that the department identifies as the best under (b) of this section to the board for approval, including evidence supporting the department’s selection, if the department concludes that the curricula and best practices

are appropriate;

are in compliance with the nondiscrimination standards established under AS

14.18.060(b)

;

are aligned with state education standards; and

result in improved academic achievement for students.

The board may approve curricula submitted under (c) of this section if the curricula are consistent with the standards established by the board under (a) of this section. The department shall place the curricula approved by the board into two categories as follows:

incentivized curricula for the best curricula for each subject, based on evidence provided to the department; the department may place not more than two curricula in this category for each subject;

designated effective curricula for the curricula for each subject that are not incentivized curricula but that the department finds appropriate and effective based on factual and other evidence provided to the department.

A three-year pilot program is established in the department, starting in the 2019-2020 school year, to test the appropriateness and effectiveness of the incentivized curricula approved under (d) of this section. In conducting the program, the department shall

establish an application process for school districts to apply for participation in the program;

select four school districts from those that apply to participate in the program, including two rural and two urban school districts, basing the selection of the school districts on the readiness and capacity of each district;

assign to each participating school district the incentivized mathematics curriculum or the incentivized English and language arts curriculum; the department shall assign the mathematics curriculum to one rural and one urban school district and the English and language arts curriculum to one rural and one urban school district;

starting in the 2019-2020 school year, distribute incentive payments, not to exceed $10,000,000 in total, to the four school districts to assist with the purchase and implementation of the curricula, including best teaching practices and professional development, and purchase of instructional materials.

At the completion of the pilot program under (e) of this section, the department shall

if the department finds that the incentivized curricula tested in the pilot program are appropriate and effective, submit the findings to the board; and

if the board finds that the curricula tested in the pilot program are appropriate and effective, make the curricula and one-time incentive payments under (g) of this section available to all school districts starting in the 2022-2023 school year and ending in the 2024-2025 school year.

The department may distribute an incentive payment available to a school district in an amount that is not more than the school district’s ADM multiplied by 150, subject to availability of funding, if the governing body of the school district

selects one of the incentivized curricula for implementation in the school district in an eligible school year under (f)(2) of this section;

requests an incentive payment from the department;

has not previously implemented the incentivized curricula; and

demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department the readiness and capacity of the school district to implement the curricula.

In addition to any unexpended money under (e)(4) of this section, the department may distribute not more than $9,500,000 in incentive payments under (f) and (g) of this section.

The department shall publish on the department’s Internet website and make available to the public

all curricula used by school districts in the state for all subjects, whether or not the curricula are approved; and

the curricula approved under (d) of this section.

The department shall submit an electronic report to the legislature and make the report available to the public on the department’s Internet website. The report must provide information on the pilot program and the curricula that each school district has adopted. On or before January 15, 2019, and each year thereafter, the department shall submit the report required under this subsection to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature that the report is available.

Each school district shall submit to the department the relevant information needed for the department to carry out its duties under this section.

Payments for curricula implementation under the pilot program described in (e) of this section and incentive payments under (f) and (g) of this section are subject to appropriation. If insufficient funding is available to distribute payments to all school districts that request funding in a year under (g) of this section, the department may distribute payments to the remaining school districts the following school year.

If the applications for participation in the pilot program are insufficient to meet the requirements under (e) of this section, the department may select four school districts from those that apply, taking into consideration geographical diversity.

Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the department may distribute incentive payments to school districts that use curricula reviewed and approved by the board under AS

14.07.165(c)

. The department may provide incentive payments, subject to appropriation, to school districts based on the readiness and capacity of the school district as determined by the department.

In this section,

“rural” has the meaning given in AS

14.43.700

;

“school district” has the meaning given in AS

14.30.350

;

“school district’s ADM” has the meaning given to “district ADM” in AS

14.17.990

;

“urban” means a community other than a community described in AS

14.43.700

;

“virtual education” means instruction delivered through telecommunications or other digital or electronic methods.

History.

(§ 3 ch 73 SLA 2018)

Delayed repeal of subsections (e) — (h), (j), (

l

), (m), and (o)(1), (o)(3), and (o)(4). —

Under sec. 11, ch. 73, SLA 2018 and sec. 102, ch. 13, SLA 2019, subsections (e) — (h), (j), (

l

), (m), and (o)(1), (o)(3), and (o)(4) are repealed July 1, 2025.

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 73, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on October 28, 2018.

Sec. 14.07.180.
Curricula approval and review; pilot program; incentives.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall establish standards and a procedure for the review, ranking, and approval of mathematics and English and language arts curricula for school districts to use in each grade level as provided in this section. The board may include curricula delivered through virtual education in the standards and procedure established under this subsection.

The department, in consultation with school districts, shall review mathematics and English and language arts curricula used in schools in the state and in other states and countries and may include in the review curricula delivered through virtual education. Not later than July 1, 2019, the department shall identify the best mathematics and English and language arts curricula and the best teaching practices for each of the curricula. The department may identify the best mathematics and English and language arts curricula delivered through virtual education.

The department shall submit the curricula and teaching practices that the department identifies as the best under (b) of this section to the board for approval, including evidence supporting the department’s selection, if the department concludes that the curricula and best practices

are appropriate;

are in compliance with the nondiscrimination standards established under AS

14.18.060(b)

;

are aligned with state education standards; and

result in improved academic achievement for students.

The board may approve curricula submitted under (c) of this section if the curricula are consistent with the standards established by the board under (a) of this section. The department shall place the curricula approved by the board into two categories as follows:

incentivized curricula for the best curricula for each subject, based on evidence provided to the department; the department may place not more than two curricula in this category for each subject;

designated effective curricula for the curricula for each subject that are not incentivized curricula but that the department finds appropriate and effective based on factual and other evidence provided to the department.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 73 SLA 2018.]

[Repealed, § 11 ch 73 SLA 2018.]

[Repealed, § 11 ch 73 SLA 2018.]

[Repealed, § 11 ch 73 SLA 2018.]

The department shall publish on the department’s Internet website and make available to the public

all curricula used by school districts in the state for all subjects, whether or not the curricula are approved; and

the curricula approved under (d) of this section.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 73 SLA 2018.]

Each school district shall submit to the department the relevant information needed for the department to carry out its duties under this section.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 73 SLA 2018.]

[Repealed, § 11 ch 73 SLA 2018.]

Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the department may distribute incentive payments to school districts that use curricula reviewed and approved by the board under AS

14.07.165(c)

. The department may provide incentive payments, subject to appropriation, to school districts based on the readiness and capacity of the school district as determined by the department.

In this section,

[Repealed, § 11 ch 73 SLA 2018.]

“school district” has the meaning given in AS

14.30.350

;

[Repealed, § 11 ch 73 SLA 2018.]

[Repealed, § 11 ch 73 SLA 2018.]

“virtual education” means instruction delivered through telecommunications or other digital or electronic methods.

History.

(§ 3 ch 73 SLA 2018; am § 11 ch 73 SLA 2018)

Sec. 14.07.181.
Pamphlet concerning controlled substances. [Repealed, § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 14.07.182.
Curriculum improvement and best practices fund.

The curriculum improvement and best practices fund is established. The fund consists of appropriations, not to exceed $19,500,000, for distribution to school districts.

Money appropriated to the fund may be expended by the department as provided under AS

14.07.180

, without further appropriation.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

Appropriations to the fund do not lapse.

History.

(§ 3 ch 73 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 73, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on October 28, 2018.